District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act
may be cited as the “Rate Plan Vacatur Interim Protections Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Retail Electric Competition and Consumer Protection Act of 1999, effective May
9, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-107; D.C. Official Code § 34-1501 et seq.), is amended by adding a new
section 106b to read as follows:
“Sec. 106b. Disconnection of service during remand interim period prohibited.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term “remand interim period” means the period of
time after the issuance of a judicial order vacating a multi-year rate plan approved by the Commission
and before a new rate plan is approved and instituted.
“(b) An electric company may not disconnect electric service for non-payment of a bill or fees
during a remand interim period or for 15 calendar days thereafter.
“(c) This section shall sunset 90 days after the effective date of the Rate Plan Vacatur Interim
Protections Emergency Amendment Act of 2026.”.

Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24,
1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia
Register.
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.